Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 1 General Provisions

47-14-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Board” means the Board of Commissioners of the Superior Court Clerks’ Retirement Fund of Georgia established under Code Section 47-14-20.

“Clerk” means:

A clerk of the superior court; or

A clerk of a state court, where the clerk of such state court is someone other than the clerk of the superior court.

“Deputy clerk” means:

A deputy of a clerk of the superior court, appointed under Code Section 15-6-59; or

A deputy clerk of a state court appointed as provided by law.

“Fund” means the Superior Court Clerks’ Retirement Fund of Georgia.

“Member” means a member of the Superior Court Clerks’ Retirement Fund of Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-14-1

; Ga. L. 2002, p. 470, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was created as part of the Code revision and was thus enacted by Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8 (Code Enactment Act).